Massachusetts, session 194th, H2089.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 30 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 39T the following section:-
Section 39U. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Covered excavation project”, construction work for which a permit may be issued to a
contractor or subcontractor to a utility company by the state, county, authority, municipality or
any other political subdivision of the commonwealth. A covered excavation project may use,
excavate or open a street. A covered excavation project shall exclude construction work for
which a permit may be issued for a service provided pursuant to section 39M of chapter 30.
“Department of jurisdiction”, the department on behalf of the state, municipality, county,
district, authority or any other officer in the state, municipality, authority or any another political
of 4

subdivision of the commonwealth appointed pursuant to law, whose duty it is to issue a permit to
a utility company or its contractors and subcontractors, for a covered excavation project.
“Fiscal officer”, the project manager appointed by the permit awarding authority of the
state, municipality, county, district, authority or any other political subdivision of the
commonwealth.
“Prevailing wage”, the minimum hourly rate set by the Massachusetts department of
labor standards pursuant to sections 26 to27F, inclusive, of chapter 149.
“Utility company”, a natural gas pipeline company, petroleum or petroleum products
pipeline company, public utility company, cable television company, municipal traffic signal
department and municipal utility company or department that supplies gas, electricity, telephone,
communication or cable television services or private water companies within the city or town
where such excavation is to be made.
(b) Each contractor or subcontractor to a utility company shall pay not less than the
prevailing rate of wages and benefits in the same trade occupation in the locality within the state
where such covered excavation project is situated to each laborer, worker or mechanic in the
employ of the contractor or subcontractor to a utility company performing work on the project.
No permit shall be issued for a covered excavation project until an agreement confirming the
payment of wages and benefits, as required by this section, has been contractually mandated and
filed with the department of jurisdiction. All permits issued after the effective date of this section
shall include therein a copy of this section.
(c) The enforcement of any covered excavation project pursuant to this section shall be
subject to the requirements of section 39M of chapter 30; sections 26 to 27F, inclusive, section
of 4

29 and section 148 of chapter 149; and chapter 152 and within the jurisdiction of the fiscal
officer; provided, however, nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to construe any
covered excavation project as otherwise being considered for public work under this section.
(d) The fiscal officer may issue rules and regulations governing the provisions of this
section. Any violations of this section shall be grounds for determinations and orders pursuant to
section 39M of chapter 30 and sections 26 to 27F, inclusive, of chapter 149.
(e) Utility companies, under local law or ordinance, required, as a condition of issuance
of a permit to use or open a street, that competent workers, licensed pursuant to section 13 of
chapter 30a and chapter 112, to perform any and all trades in compliance with federal and state
law, shall be employed thereon and that the prevailing wages and benefits shall be the prevailing
wage for the similar titles as established by the fiscal officer pursuant to this section, paid to
those employed, shall be required to keep original payrolls and transcripts thereof, subscribed
and sworn to or affirmed by them as true under the penalties of perjury, setting forth the names
and addresses and showing for each worker, laborer or mechanic the: (i) hours and days worked;
(ii) occupations worked; (iii) hourly wage rates and benefits paid; and the (iv) supplements paid
or provided as, and in the manner required pursuant to sections 26 to 27F, inclusive, of chapter
149.
(f) A contractor or subcontractor to a utility company to whom a permit may be issued to
use or open a street shall be required to comply with section 39M of chapter 30 and sections 26
to 27F, inclusive, of chapter 149 as a condition of the issuance of a permit to use or open a street.
(g) A contractor or subcontractor to a utility company shall be required to agree, as a
condition of issuance of a permit to use or open a street, that competent workers, licensed
of 4

pursuant to section 13 of chapter 30a and chapter 112, to perform any and all trades in
compliance with federal and state law, shall be employed thereon and that prevailing wages and
benefits shall be the prevailing wage for the similar titles as established by the fiscal officer
pursuant to this section, paid to those so employed. A contractor or subcontractor to a utility
company shall be required to keep original payrolls and transcripts thereof, subscribed and sworn
to or affirmed by them as true under the penalties of perjury, setting forth the names and
addresses and showing for each worker, laborer or mechanic the: (i) hours and days worked; (ii)
occupations worked; (iii) hourly wage rates and benefits paid; and (iv) supplements paid or
provided as, and in the manner required by sections 26 to 27F, inclusive, of said chapter 149.
of 4